South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4394.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 13, Title 63 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 63-13-220. The Department of Social Services and the Department of Employment and Workforce shall collaborate to offer workforce development childcare stipends to unemployed parents or caregivers seeking employment while the parent or caregiver is at a job interview, which may be used for children under the age of twelve years. The childcare centers at which workforce development stipends may be used must be located throughout the State to ensure meaningful access by unemployed residents of South Carolina, and participating childcare centers must ensure sufficient capacity to offer as-needed access to the childcare center's services for the eligible children of unemployed parents or caregivers engaged in job interviews. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----